Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-749
Grounds for rendition.

(a) For purposes of sections 42-749 and 42-750, Governor includes an individual performing the functions of Governor or the executive authority of a state covered by the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act.

(b) The Governor of this state may:

(1) demand that the Governor of another state surrender an individual found in the other state who is charged criminally in this state with having failed to provide for the support of an obligee; or

(2) on the demand of the Governor of another state, surrender an individual found in this state who is charged criminally in the other state with having failed to provide for the support of an obligee.

(c) A provision for extradition of individuals not inconsistent with the act applies to the demand even if the individual whose surrender is demanded was not in the demanding state when the crime was allegedly committed and has not fled therefrom.

Laws 1993, LB 500, § 49;

Laws 2003, LB 148, § 87.